Utah statutes.
17-53-312.   County resource development committee -- Membership -- Term -- Compensation and expenses -- Duties.

(1) (a)  A county executive may, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, appoint a county resource development committee of three or more members, at least one of which shall be a member of the county legislative body.

(b)  Each member of a county resource development committee shall be a resident of the county.

(2) (a)  The term of each member of a county resource development committee shall be two years and until a successor has been appointed.

(b)  The legislative body of each county with a county resource development committee shall provide by ordinance for the filling of a vacancy in the membership of the committee and for the removal of a member for nonperformance of duty or misconduct.

(3) (a)  Each member shall serve without compensation.

(b)  The county legislative body may reimburse a member for actual expenses incurred in performing the member's duties and responsibilities on the committee, upon presentation of proper receipts and vouchers.

(4)  The committee may elect such officers from its members as it considers appropriate and may, with the consent and approval of the county legislative body, employ an executive director for the committee.

(5)  The committee shall:

(a)  assist in promoting the development of the county's mineral, water, manpower, industrial, historical, cultural, and other resources; and

(b)  make such recommendations to the county for resource development as the committee considers advisable.

(6)  The county executive may cooperate and enter into contracts with municipalities, local communities, other counties, and the state for the purpose of promoting the development of the economic, historical, and cultural resources of the county.

